test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_alge_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - alme: # ok ALGE
    alme+N+Sg+Nom:  alme
    alme+N+Sg+Gen:  alme
    alme+N+Sg+Acc:  alme
    alme+N+Sg+Ill:  aalman
    alme+N+Sg+Loc:  almeest
    alme+N+Sg+Com:  olmijn
    alme+N+Sg+Abe:  almettáá
    alme+N+Ess:  almen
    alme+N+Par:  almed
    alme+N+Pl+Nom:  almeh
    alme+N+Pl+Gen:  [oolmij, olmij]
    alme+N+Pl+Acc:  oolmijd 
    alme+N+Pl+Ill:  olmijd
    alme+N+Pl+Loc:  oolmijn
    alme+N+Pl+Com:  [olmijguin, olmijgijn]
    alme+N+Pl+Abe:  olmijttáá

  Noun - alge: # ok ALGE
    alge+N+Sg+Nom:  alge
    alge+N+Sg+Gen:  alge
    alge+N+Sg+Acc:  alge
    alge+N+Sg+Ill:  aalgan
    alge+N+Sg+Loc:  algeest
    alge+N+Sg+Com:  olgijn
    alge+N+Sg+Abe:  algettáá
    alge+N+Ess:  algen
    alge+N+Par:  alged
    alge+N+Pl+Nom:  algeh
    alge+N+Pl+Gen:  [oolgij, olgij]
    alge+N+Pl+Acc: oolgijd
    alge+N+Pl+Ill:  olgijd
    alge+N+Pl+Loc:  oolgijn
    alge+N+Pl+Com:  [olgijguin, olgijgijn]
    alge+N+Pl+Abe:  olgijttáá


  Noun - aske: # ok ALGE
    aske+N+Sg+Nom:  aske
    aske+N+Sg+Gen:  aske
    aske+N+Sg+Acc:  aske
    aske+N+Sg+Ill:  aaskan
    aske+N+Sg+Loc:  askeest
    aske+N+Sg+Com:  oskijn
    aske+N+Sg+Abe:  askettáá
    aske+N+Ess:   asken
    aske+N+Par:  asked
    aske+N+Pl+Nom:  askeh
    aske+N+Pl+Gen:  [ooskij, oskij]
    aske+N+Pl+Acc:  ooskijd
    aske+N+Pl+Ill:  oskijd
    aske+N+Pl+Loc:  ooskijn
    aske+N+Pl+Com:  [oskijguin, oskijgijn]
    aske+N+Pl+Abe:  oskijttáá

  Noun - pispe: #ok ALGE
    pispe+N+Sg+Nom:  pispe
    pispe+N+Sg+Gen:  pispe
    pispe+N+Sg+Acc:  pispe
    pispe+N+Sg+Ill:  piispán
    pispe+N+Sg+Loc:  pispeest
    pispe+N+Sg+Com:  pispijn
    pispe+N+Sg+Abe:  pispettáá
    pispe+N+Ess:  pispen
    pispe+N+Par: pisped
    pispe+N+Pl+Nom:  pispeh
    pispe+N+Pl+Gen:  [piispij, pispij]
    pispe+N+Pl+Acc:  piispijd
    pispe+N+Pl+Ill:  pispijd
    pispe+N+Pl+Loc:  piispijn
    pispe+N+Pl+Com:  [pispijguin, pispijgijn]
    pispe+N+Pl+Abe:  pispijttáá

  Noun - olbe: # ok ALGE
    olbe+N+Sg+Nom:  olbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Gen:  olbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Acc:  olbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Ill:  oolbán
    olbe+N+Sg+Loc:  olbeest
    olbe+N+Sg+Com:  ulbijn
    olbe+N+Sg+Abe:  olbettáá
    olbe+N+Ess:  olben
    olbe+N+Par:  olbed
    olbe+N+Pl+Nom:  olbeh
    olbe+N+Pl+Gen:  [uulbij, ulbij]
    olbe+N+Pl+Acc:  uulbijd
    olbe+N+Pl+Ill:  ulbijd
    olbe+N+Pl+Loc:  uulbijn
    olbe+N+Pl+Com:  [ulbijguin, ulbijgijn]
    olbe+N+Pl+Abe:  ulbijttáá

  Noun - juhle: # ok ALGE
    juhle+N+Sg+Nom:  juhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Gen:  juhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Acc:  juhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Ill:  juuhlán
    juhle+N+Sg+Loc:  juhleest
    juhle+N+Sg+Com:  juhlijn
    juhle+N+Sg+Abe:  juhlettáá
    juhle+N+Ess:   juhlen
    juhle+N+Par:  juhled
    juhle+N+Pl+Nom:  juhleh
    juhle+N+Pl+Gen:  [juuhlij, juhlij]
    juhle+N+Pl+Acc:  juuhlijd
    juhle+N+Pl+Ill:  juhlijd
    juhle+N+Pl+Loc:  juuhlijn
    juhle+N+Pl+Com:  [juhlijguin, juhlijgijn]
    juhle+N+Pl+Abe:  juhlijttáá

  Noun - lakke: # ok 
    lakke+N+Sg+Nom:  lakke
    lakke+N+Sg+Gen:  lahe
    lakke+N+Sg+Acc:  lahe
    lakke+N+Sg+Ill:  laakan
    lakke+N+Sg+Loc:  lahheest
    lakke+N+Sg+Com:  lohhijn
    lakke+N+Sg+Abe:  lahettáá
    lakke+N+Ess:  lakken
    lakke+N+Par:  lakked
    lakke+N+Pl+Nom:  laheh
    lakke+N+Pl+Gen:  [loohij, lohij]
    lakke+N+Pl+Acc:  loohijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Ill:  lohhijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Loc:  loohijn
    lakke+N+Pl+Com:  [lohijguin, lohijgijn]
    lakke+N+Pl+Abe:  lohijttáá

  Noun - lokke: # ok 
    lokke+N+Sg+Nom:  lokke
    lokke+N+Sg+Gen:  lohe
    lokke+N+Sg+Acc:  lohe
    lokke+N+Sg+Ill:  lookán
    lokke+N+Sg+Loc:  lohheest
    lokke+N+Sg+Com:  luhhijn
    lokke+N+Sg+Abe:  lohettáá
    lokke+N+Ess:  lokken
    lokke+N+Par:  lokked
    lokke+N+Pl+Nom:  loheh
    lokke+N+Pl+Gen: [luuhij, luhij]
    lokke+N+Pl+Acc:  luuhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Ill:  luhhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Loc:  luuhijn
    lokke+N+Pl+Com:  [luhijguin, luhijgijn]
    lokke+N+Pl+Abe:  luhijttáá

  Noun - rokke: # ok 
    rokke+N+Sg+Nom:  rokke
    rokke+N+Sg+Gen:  rohe
    rokke+N+Sg+Acc:  rohe
    rokke+N+Sg+Ill:  rookán
    rokke+N+Sg+Loc:  rohheest
    rokke+N+Sg+Com:  ruhhijn
    rokke+N+Sg+Abe:  rohettáá
    rokke+N+Ess:  rokken
    rokke+N+Par:  rokked
    rokke+N+Pl+Nom:  roheh
    rokke+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuhij, ruhij]
    rokke+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Ill:  ruhhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuhijn
    rokke+N+Pl+Com:  [ruhijguin, ruhijgijn]
    rokke+N+Pl+Abe:  ruhijttáá

  Noun - čukke: # ok 
    čukke+N+Sg+Nom:  čukke
    čukke+N+Sg+Gen:  čuhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Acc:  čuhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Ill:  čuukán
    čukke+N+Sg+Loc:  čuhheest
    čukke+N+Sg+Com:  čuhhijn
    čukke+N+Sg+Abe:  čuhettáá
    čukke+N+Ess:  čukken
    čukke+N+Par:  čukked
    čukke+N+Pl+Nom:  čuheh
    čukke+N+Pl+Gen: [čuuhij, čuhij]
    čukke+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Ill:  čuhhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuhijn
    čukke+N+Pl+Com:  [čuhijguin, čuhijgijn]
    čukke+N+Pl+Abe:  čuhijttáá

  Noun - mokke: # ok 
    mokke+N+Sg+Nom:  mokke
    mokke+N+Sg+Gen:  mohe
    mokke+N+Sg+Acc:  mohe
    mokke+N+Sg+Ill:  mookán
    mokke+N+Sg+Loc:  mohheest
    mokke+N+Sg+Com:  muhhijn
    mokke+N+Sg+Abe:  mohettáá
    mokke+N+Ess:  mokken
    mokke+N+Par:  mokked
    mokke+N+Pl+Nom:  moheh
    mokke+N+Pl+Gen: [muuhij, muhij]
    mokke+N+Pl+Acc:  muuhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Ill:  muhhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Loc:  muuhijn
    mokke+N+Pl+Com:  [muhijguin, muhijgijn]
    mokke+N+Pl+Abe:  muhijttáá

  Noun - tikke: # ok 
    tikke+N+Sg+Nom:  tikke
    tikke+N+Sg+Gen:  tihe
    tikke+N+Sg+Acc:  tihe
    tikke+N+Sg+Ill:  tiikán
    tikke+N+Sg+Loc:  tihheest
    tikke+N+Sg+Com:  tihhijn
    tikke+N+Sg+Abe:  tihettáá
    tikke+N+Ess:  tikken
    tikke+N+Par:  tikked
    tikke+N+Pl+Nom:  tiheh
    tikke+N+Pl+Gen: [tiihij, tihij]
    tikke+N+Pl+Acc:  tiihijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Ill:  tihhijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Loc:  tiihijn
    tikke+N+Pl+Com:  [tihijguin, tihijgijn]
    tikke+N+Pl+Abe:  tihijttáá


  Noun - kukse: # ok 
    kukse+N+Sg+Nom:  kukse
    kukse+N+Sg+Gen:  kuvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Acc:  kuvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Ill:  kuuksán
    kukse+N+Sg+Loc:  kuvsseest
    kukse+N+Sg+Com:  kuvssijn
    kukse+N+Sg+Abe:  kuvsettáá
    kukse+N+Ess:  kuksen
    kukse+N+Par:  kuksed
    kukse+N+Pl+Nom:  kuvseh
    kukse+N+Pl+Gen: [kuuvsij, kuvsij]
    kukse+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvsijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Ill:  kuvssijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvsijn
    kukse+N+Pl+Com:  [kuvsijguin, kuvsijgijn]
    kukse+N+Pl+Abe:  kuvsijttáá

  Noun - hadde: # ok HADDE
    hadde+N+Sg+Nom:  hadde
    hadde+N+Sg+Gen:  hade
    hadde+N+Sg+Acc:  hade
    hadde+N+Sg+Ill:  haadan
    hadde+N+Sg+Loc:  haddeest
    hadde+N+Sg+Com:  hoddijn
    hadde+N+Sg+Abe:  hadettáá
    hadde+N+Ess:  hadden
    hadde+N+Par:  hadded
    hadde+N+Pl+Nom:  hadeh
    hadde+N+Pl+Gen:  [hoodij, hodij]
    hadde+N+Pl+Acc:  hoodijd
    hadde+N+Pl+Ill:  hoddijd
    hadde+N+Pl+Loc:  hoodijn
    hadde+N+Pl+Com:  [hodijguin, hodijgijn]
    hadde+N+Pl+Abe:  hodijttáá

  Noun - sappe: # ok HADDE
    sappe+N+Sg+Nom:  sappe
    sappe+N+Sg+Gen:  sape
    sappe+N+Sg+Acc:  sape
    sappe+N+Sg+Ill:  saapan
    sappe+N+Sg+Loc:  sappeest
    sappe+N+Sg+Com:  soppijn
    sappe+N+Sg+Abe:  sapettáá
    sappe+N+Ess:  sappen
    sappe+N+Par:  sapped
    sappe+N+Pl+Nom:  sapeh
    sappe+N+Pl+Gen:  [soopij, sopij]
    sappe+N+Pl+Acc:  soopijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Ill:  soppijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Loc:  soopijn
    sappe+N+Pl+Com:  [sopijguin, sopijgijn]
    sappe+N+Pl+Abe:  sopijttáá

  Noun - litte: # ok HADDE
    litte+N+Sg+Nom:  litte
    litte+N+Sg+Gen:  lite
    litte+N+Sg+Acc:  lite
    litte+N+Sg+Ill:  liitán
    litte+N+Sg+Loc:  litteest
    litte+N+Sg+Com:  littijn
    litte+N+Sg+Abe:  litettáá
    litte+N+Ess:  litten
    litte+N+Par:  litted
    litte+N+Pl+Nom:  liteh
    litte+N+Pl+Gen:  [liitij, litij]
    litte+N+Pl+Acc:  liitijd
    litte+N+Pl+Ill:  littijd # MM
    litte+N+Pl+Loc:  liitijn
    litte+N+Pl+Com:  [litijguin, litijgijn]
    litte+N+Pl+Abe:  litijttáá

  Noun - lodde: # ok HADDE
    lodde+N+Sg+Nom:  lodde
    lodde+N+Sg+Gen:  lode
    lodde+N+Sg+Acc:  lode
    lodde+N+Sg+Ill:  loodán
    lodde+N+Sg+Loc:  loddeest
    lodde+N+Sg+Com:  luddijn
    lodde+N+Sg+Abe:  lodettáá
    lodde+N+Ess:  lodden
    lodde+N+Par:  lodded
    lodde+N+Pl+Nom:  lodeh
    lodde+N+Pl+Gen:  [luudij, ludij]
    lodde+N+Pl+Acc:  luudijd
    lodde+N+Pl+Ill:  luddijd
    lodde+N+Pl+Loc:  luudijn
    lodde+N+Pl+Com:  [ludijguin, ludijgijn]
    lodde+N+Pl+Abe:  ludijttáá

  Noun - lanne: # ok HADDE
    lanne+N+Sg+Nom:  lanne
    lanne+N+Sg+Gen:  lane
    lanne+N+Sg+Acc:  lane
    lanne+N+Sg+Ill:  laanan
    lanne+N+Sg+Loc:  lanneest
    lanne+N+Sg+Com:  lonnijn
    lanne+N+Sg+Abe:  lanettáá
    lanne+N+Ess:  lannen
    lanne+N+Par:  lanned
    lanne+N+Pl+Nom:  laneh
    lanne+N+Pl+Gen:  [loonij, lonij]
    lanne+N+Pl+Acc:  loonijd
    lanne+N+Pl+Ill:  lonnijd
    lanne+N+Pl+Loc:  loonijn
    lanne+N+Pl+Com:  [lonijguin, lonijgijn]
    lanne+N+Pl+Abe:  lonijttáá

  Noun - ponne: # ok HADDE
    ponne+N+Sg+Nom:  ponne
    ponne+N+Sg+Gen:  pone
    ponne+N+Sg+Acc:  pone
    ponne+N+Sg+Ill:  poonán
    ponne+N+Sg+Loc:  ponneest
    ponne+N+Sg+Com:  punnijn
    ponne+N+Sg+Abe:  ponettáá
    ponne+N+Ess:  ponnen
    ponne+N+Par:  ponned
    ponne+N+Pl+Nom:  poneh
    ponne+N+Pl+Gen:  [puunij, punij]
    ponne+N+Pl+Acc:  puunijd
    ponne+N+Pl+Ill:  punnijd
    ponne+N+Pl+Loc:  puunijn
    ponne+N+Pl+Com:  [punijguin, punijgijn]
    ponne+N+Pl+Abe:  punijttáá

  Noun - runne: # ok HADDE
    runne+N+Sg+Nom:  runne
    runne+N+Sg+Gen:  rune
    runne+N+Sg+Acc:  rune
    runne+N+Sg+Ill:  ruunán
    runne+N+Sg+Loc:  runneest
    runne+N+Sg+Com:  runnijn
    runne+N+Sg+Abe:  runettáá
    runne+N+Ess:  runnen
    runne+N+Par:  runned
    runne+N+Pl+Nom:  runeh
    runne+N+Pl+Gen:  [ruunij, runij]
    runne+N+Pl+Acc:  ruunijd
    runne+N+Pl+Ill:  runnijd
    runne+N+Pl+Loc:  ruunijn
    runne+N+Pl+Com:  [runijguin, runijgijn]
    runne+N+Pl+Abe:  runijttáá

  Noun - cumme: # ok HADDE
    cumme+N+Sg+Nom:  cumme
    cumme+N+Sg+Gen:  cume
    cumme+N+Sg+Acc:  cume
    cumme+N+Sg+Ill:  cuumán
    cumme+N+Sg+Loc:  cummeest
    cumme+N+Sg+Com:  cummijn
    cumme+N+Sg+Abe:  cumettáá
    cumme+N+Ess:  cummen
    cumme+N+Par:  cummed
    cumme+N+Pl+Nom:  cumeh
    cumme+N+Pl+Gen:  [cuumij, cumij]
    cumme+N+Pl+Acc:  cuumijd
    cumme+N+Pl+Ill:  cummijd
    cumme+N+Pl+Loc:  cuumijn
    cumme+N+Pl+Com:  [cumijguin, cumijgijn]
    cumme+N+Pl+Abe:  cumijttáá

  Noun - pille: # ok HADDE
    pille+N+Sg+Nom:  pille
    pille+N+Sg+Gen:  pile
    pille+N+Sg+Acc:  pile
    pille+N+Sg+Ill:  piilán
    pille+N+Sg+Loc:  pilleest
    pille+N+Sg+Com:  pillijn
    pille+N+Sg+Abe:  pilettáá
    pille+N+Ess:  pillen
    pille+N+Par: pilled
    pille+N+Pl+Nom:  pileh
    pille+N+Pl+Gen:  [piilij, pilij]
    pille+N+Pl+Acc:  piilijd
    pille+N+Pl+Ill:  pillijd
    pille+N+Pl+Loc:  piilijn
    pille+N+Pl+Com:  [pilijguin, pilijgijn]
    pille+N+Pl+Abe:  pilijttáá

  Noun - nartte: # ok HADDE
    nartte+N+Sg+Nom:  nartte
    nartte+N+Sg+Gen:  narte
    nartte+N+Sg+Acc:  narte
    nartte+N+Sg+Ill:  naartan
    nartte+N+Sg+Loc:  nartteest
    nartte+N+Sg+Com:  norttijn
    nartte+N+Sg+Abe:  nartettáá
    nartte+N+Ess:  nartten
    nartte+N+Par:  nartted
    nartte+N+Pl+Nom:  narteh
    nartte+N+Pl+Gen:  [noortij, nortij]
    nartte+N+Pl+Acc:  noortijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Ill:  norttijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Loc:  noortijn
    nartte+N+Pl+Com:  [nortijguin, nortijgijn]
    nartte+N+Pl+Abe:  nortijttáá
